Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201621-2,107
Standards of conduct for officers.

(MBCA 8.42) (a) An officer,
when performing in such capacity, has the duty to act:

(1) In good faith;

(2) With the care that
a person in a like position would reasonably exercise under similar circumstances;
and

(3)
In a manner the officer reasonably believes to be in the best interests of
the corporation.

(b)
The duty of an officer includes the obligation:

(1) To inform the superior officer
to whom, or the board of directors or the committee thereof to which, the
officer reports of information about the affairs of the corporation known
to the officer, within the scope of the officer's functions, and known to
the officer to be material to such superior officer, board, or committee;
and

(2)
To inform his or her superior officer, or another appropriate person within
the corporation, or the board of directors, or a committee thereof, of any
actual or probable material violation of law involving the corporation or
material breach of duty to the corporation by an officer, employee, or agent
of the corporation, that the officer believes has occurred or is likely to
occur.

(c)
In discharging his or her duties, an officer who does not have knowledge that
makes reliance unwarranted is entitled to rely on:

(1) The performance of properly
delegated responsibilities by one or more employees of the corporation whom
the officer reasonably believes to be reliable and competent in performing
the responsibilities delegated; or

(2) Information, opinions, reports, or statements,
including financial statements and other financial data, prepared or presented
by one or more employees of the corporation whom the officer reasonably believes
to be reliable and competent in the matters presented or by legal counsel,
public accountants, or other persons retained by the corporation as to matters
involving skills or expertise the officer reasonably believes are matters
(i) within the particular person's professional or expert competence or (ii)
as to which the particular person merits confidence.

(d) An officer shall not be liable
to the corporation or its shareholders for any decision to take or not to
take action or any failure to take any action as an officer if the duties
of the office are performed in compliance with this section. Whether an officer
who does not comply with this section shall have liability will depend in
such instance on applicable law, including those principles of section 21-2,103
that have relevance.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 107.